src/Morphonology/Alternations/Alternations.foma
load stack ../../Accentuation/ConvStress/GetConvStress.bin
invert net
define GetConvStress;
source ../../LetterClasses.foma
source ../../ParadigmFeatures.foma
source ../../Properties.foma
define W Letter+ Sep Letter* Feature+;
define class1 %+Alt1|%+Alt2|%+Alt3|%+Alt4|%+Alt5|%+Alt6|%+Alt7|%+Alt8|%+Alt9|%+Alt10|
	%+Alt11|%+Alt12|%+Alt13|%+Alt14|%+Alt15|%+Alt16|%+Alt17;
define class2 %+Alt18|%+Alt19|%+Alt20|%+Alt21|%+Alt22|%+Alt23;
define class3 %+Alt24|%+Alt25;
define class4 %+Alt26;
define class5 %+Alt27|%+Alt28;
define class6 %+Alt29|%+Alt30|%+Alt31|%+Alt32;
define class7 %+Alt33|%+Alt34;
define class8 %+Alt35;
define class9 %+Alt36;
define class10 %+Alt37;
define class11 %+Alt38|%+Alt39;
define class12 %+Alt40;
define class13 %+Alt41|%+Alt42|%+Alt43|%+Alt44|%+Alt45|%+Alt46|%+Alt47|%+Alt48|%+Alt49|%+Alt50;
define class14 %+Alt51|%+Alt52|%+Alt53;
define class15 %+Alt54;
define class16 %+Alt55;
define class17 %+Alt56;
define class18 %+Alt57;
define class19 %+Alt58;
define class20 %+Alt59|%+Alt60|%+Alt61;

!!!_____________________Класс I_____________________!!!
define r1 к -> ч || _ "|" %+Alt1 .o. %+Alt1 -> 0;
define r2 г -> з || _ "|" %+Alt2 .o. %+Alt2 -> 0;
define r3 х -> ш || _ "|" %+Alt3 .o. %+Alt3 -> 0;
define r4 о -> е || _ Irr Letter+ Sep %+Alt4 .o. %+Alt4 -> 0;
define r5 и -> е || _ "|" %+Alt5 .o. %+Alt5 -> 0;
define r6 и Irr н -> 0 || _ "|" %+Alt6 .o. %+Alt6 -> 0;
define r7 {'*н} -> 0 || _ "|" %+Alt7 .o. %+Alt7 -> 0;
define r8 {*́к} -> 0 || _ "|" %+Alt8 .o. %+Alt8 -> 0;
define r9 {иц} -> 0 || _ "|" %+Alt9 .o. %+Alt9 -> 0;
define r10 [..] -> {ов} || _ "|" %+Alt10 .o. %+Alt10 -> 0;
define r11 [..] -> {ес} || _ "|" %+Alt11 .o. %+Alt11 -> 0;
define r12 [..] -> {*j} || _ "|" %+Alt12 .o. %+Alt12 -> 0;
define r13 [..] -> ' || _ "|" %+Alt13 .o. %+Alt13 -> 0;
define r14 {он*к} -> {ат}, {о́н*к} -> {а́т} || _ "|" %+Alt14 .o. %+Alt14 -> 0;
define r15 {*́к} -> {'а́т} || _ "|" %+Alt15 .o. %+Alt15 -> 0;
define r16 {реб'о́н*к} -> {де́т'} || _ "|" %+Alt16 .o. %+Alt16 -> 0;
define r17 {челове́к} -> {л'у́д'} || _ "|" %+Alt17 .o. %+Alt17 -> 0;
define b1 r1 .o. r2 .o. r3 .o. r4 .o. r5 .o. r6 .o. r7 .o. r8 .o. r9 .o. r10 .o. r11 .o. r12 .o. r13 .o. r14 .o. r15 .o. r16 .o. r17;
define morphome1 b1 .o. W %+Plur Case Tail;
define c1 morphome1 .P. [?* .o. class1 -> 0];
!!!_____________________Класс II_____________________!!!
define r18 ' -> 0 || _ "|" %+Alt18 .o. %+Alt18 -> 0;
define r19 о Irr с -> 0 || _ "|" %+Alt19 .o. %+Alt19 -> 0;
define r20 [..] -> {он} || _ "|" %+Alt20 .o. %+Alt20 -> 0;
define r21 [..] -> {ан} || _ "|" %+Alt21 .o. %+Alt21 -> 0;
define r22 [..] -> {ер'} || _ "|" %+Alt22 .o. %+Alt22 -> 0;
define r23 [..] -> у || _ "|" %+Alt23 .o. %+Alt23 -> 0;
define b2 r18 .o. r19 .o. r20 .o. r21 .o. r22 .o. r23;
define morphome2 b2 .o. W [Number Case - %+Sing %+Nom] Tail;
define c2 morphome2 .P. [?* .o. class2 -> 0];
!!!_____________________Класс III_____________________!!!
define r24 ' -> 0 || _ "|" %+Alt24 .o. %+Alt24 -> 0;
define r25 {год} -> {лет} || _ "|" %+Alt25 .o. %+Alt25 -> 0;
define b3  r24 .o. r25;
define morphome3 b3 .o. W %+Plur %+Gen Tail;
define c3 morphome3 .P. [?* .o. class3 -> 0];
!!!_____________________Класс IV_____________________!!!
define r26 ' -> 0 || _ "|" %+Alt26 .o. %+Alt26 -> 0;
define b3 r26;
define morphome4 b3 .o. W %+Plur [%+Loc|%+Dat|%+Ins] Tail;
define c4 morphome4 .P. [?* .o. %+Alt26 -> 0];
!!!_____________________Класс V_____________________!!!
define r27 [..] -> ' || _ "|" %+Alt27 .o. %+Alt27 -> 0;
define r28 [..] -> {ат'} || _ "|" %+Alt28 .o. %+Alt28 -> 0;
define b5 r27 .o. r28;
define morphome5 b5 .o. W %+Sing [Case - %+Nom] Tail;
define c5 morphome5 .P. [?* .o. class5 -> 0];
!!!_____________________Класс VI_____________________!!!
define r29 {'*н} -> 0 || _ "|" %+Alt29 .o. %+Alt29 -> 0;
define r30 ' -> 0 || _ "|" %+Alt30 .o. %+Alt30 -> 0;
define r31 {ен'*к} -> 0 || _ "|" %+Alt31 .o. %+Alt31 -> 0;
define r32 {бол'ш} -> {велик} || _ "|" %+Alt32 .o. %+Alt32 -> 0;
define b6 r29 .o. r30 .o. r31 .o. r32;
define morphome6 b6 .o. W %+Short Gender Number Tail;
define c6 morphome6 .P. [?* .o. class6 -> 0];
!!!_____________________Класс VII_____________________!!!
define r33 {'%*н} -> 0 || _ "|" %+Alt33 .o. %+Alt33 -> 0;
define r34 ' -> 0 || _ "|" %+Alt34 .o. %+Alt34 -> 0;
define b7 r33 .o. r34;
define morphome7 b7 .o. W %+Short %+Masc %+Sing Tail;
define c7 morphome7 .P. [?* .o. class7 -> 0];
!!!_____________________Класс VIII_____________________!!!
define r35 ' -> 0 || _ "|" %+Alt35 .o. %+Alt35 -> 0;
define b r35;
define morphome b .o. W %+Short [%+Masc|%+Fem] %+Sing Tail;
define c8 morphome .P. [?* .o. class8 -> 0];
!!!_____________________Класс IX_____________________!!!
define r36 {от} -> 0 || _ "|" %+Alt36 .o. %+Alt36 -> 0;
define b r36;
define morphome b .o. W [Gender Number Case - %+Masc %+Sing %+Nom] Tail;
define c9 morphome .P. [?* .o. class9 -> 0];
!!!_____________________Класс X_____________________!!!
define r37 [..] -> ' || _ "|" %+Alt37 .o. %+Alt37 -> 0;
define b r37;
define morphome b .o. W [Gender %+Plur Case | [%+Masc|%+Neut] %+Sing %+Ins] Tail;
define c10 morphome .P. [?* .o. class10 -> 0];
!!!_____________________Класс XI_____________________!!!
define r38 {еj} -> 0 || _ "|" %+Alt38 .o. %+Alt38 -> 0;
define r39 [..] -> {оj} || _ "|" %+Alt39 .o. %+Alt39 -> 0;
define b r38 .o. r39;
define morphome b .o. W [Gender Number [Case - [%+Nom | %+Acc]]] Tail;
define c11 morphome .P. [?* .o. class11 -> 0];
!!!_____________________Класс XII_____________________!!!
define r40 [..] -> {оj} || _ "|" %+Alt40 .o. %+Alt40 -> 0;
define b r40;
define morphome b .o. W [[%+Masc|%+Neut] %+Sing [%+Gen|%+Dat|%+Loc]] Tail;
define c12 morphome .P. [?* .o. class12 -> 0];
!!!_____________________Класс XIII_____________________!!!
define r41 т -> 0 || _ "|" %+Alt41 .o. %+Alt41 -> 0;
define r42 е -> 0 || .#. в о Irr с ' _ Letter+ "|" %+Alt42 .o. %+Alt42 -> 0;
define r43 [..] -> ' || _ "|" %+Alt43 .o. %+Alt43 -> 0;
define r44 [..] -> {оj} || _ "|" %+Alt44 .o. %+Alt44 -> 0;
define r45 {jа́} -> {мен} || _ "|" %+Alt45 .o. %+Alt45 -> 0;
define r46 {ы́} -> {еб} || _ "|" %+Alt46 .o. %+Alt46 -> 0;
define r47 м -> н || _ "|" %+Alt47 .o. %+Alt47 -> 0;
define r48 о Irr н -> j || _ "|" %+Alt48 .o. %+Alt48 -> 0;
define r49 ' -> 0 || _ "|" %+Alt49 .o. %+Alt49 -> 0;
define r50 [..] -> у || _ "|" %+Alt50 .o. %+Alt50 -> 0;
define b r41 .o. r42 .o. r43 .o. r44 .o. r45 .o. r46 .o. r47 .o. r49 .o. r48 .o. r50;
define morphome b .o. W Gender Number [Case - %+Nom] Tail;
define c13 morphome .P. [?* .o. class13 -> 0];
!!!_____________________Класс XIV_____________________!!!
define r51 ' -> 0 || _ "|" %+Alt51 .o. %+Alt51 -> 0;
define r52 [..] -> {оj} || _ "|" %+Alt52 .o. %+Alt52 -> 0;
define r53 ы -> {ве} || .#. {чет} _ Letter+ Sep %+Alt53 .o. %+Alt53 -> 0;
define b r51 .o. r52 .o. r53;
define morphome b .o. W %+Parn Number %+Nom Tail;
define c14 morphome .P. [?* .o. class14 -> 0];
!!!_____________________Класс XV_____________________!!!
define r54 о -> е || _ "|" %+Alt54 .o. %+Alt54 -> 0;
define b r54;
define morphome b .o. W %+Fem Number [%+Gen|%+Dat|%+Ins|%+Loc] Tail;
define c15 morphome .P. [?* .o. class15 -> 0];
!!!_____________________Класс XVI_____________________!!!
define r55 е -> 0 || _ Letter+ Sep %+Alt55 .o. %+Alt55 -> 0;
define b r55;
define morphome b .o. W %+Fem Number [%+Dat|%+Ins|%+Loc] Tail;
define c16 morphome .P. [?* .o. class16 -> 0];
!!!_____________________Класс XVII_____________________!!!
define r56 е -> о || _ Letter+ Sep %+Alt56 .o. %+Alt56 -> 0;
define b r56;
define morphome b .o. W Gender Number %+Ins Tail;
define c17 morphome .P. [?* .o. class17 -> 0];
!!!_____________________Класс XVIII_____________________!!!
define r57 [..] -> ' || _ "|" %+Alt57 .o. %+Alt57 -> 0;
define b r57;
define morphome b .o. W [Gender Number %+Gen] Tail;
define c18a morphome .P. ?*;
define r57 ' -> 0 || _ "|" %+Alt57 .o. %+Alt57 -> 0;
define b r57;
define morphome b .o. W Gender Number [Case - %+Gen] Tail;
define c18b morphome .P. [?* .o. class18 -> 0];
define c18 c18a .o. c18b;
!!!_____________________Класс XIX_____________________!!!
define NumeralStems {п'ат'}|{шест'}|с е Irr м '|в о Irr с ' ("*"|е) м '|{дев'ат'};
define SecondParts {дес'} а Irr {т'} | {с*́т};
define r58 [..] -> ы || .#. NumeralStems _ SecondParts "|" %+Alt58 .o. %+Alt58 -> 0;
define b r58;
define morphome b .o. W Gender Number [%+Gen|%+Dat|%+Loc] Tail;
define c19a morphome .P. ?*;
define r58 [..] -> {jу} || .#. NumeralStems _ SecondParts "|" %+Alt58 .o. %+Alt58 -> 0;
define b r58;
define morphome b .o. W Gender Number %+Ins Tail;
define c19b morphome .P. [?* .o. class19 -> 0];
define c19 c19a .o. c19b;
!!!_____________________Класс XX_____________________!!!
define r59 е Acc -> {ух} || .#. {дв} _ {с*т} "|" %+Alt59 .o. %+Alt59 -> 0;
define r60 и Acc -> ' о̀ х || .#. {тр} _ {с*т} "|" %+Alt60 .o. %+Alt60 -> 0;
define r61 е -> ' о̀ х || .#. {четы́р} _ {с*т} "|" %+Alt61 .o. %+Alt61 -> 0;
define b r59 .o. r60 .o. r61;
define morphome b .o. W Gender Number [%+Gen | %+Loc] Tail;
define c20a morphome .P. ?*;
define r59 е Acc -> {ум} || .#. {дв} _ {с*т} "|" %+Alt59 .o. %+Alt59 -> 0;
define r60 и Acc -> ' о̀ м || .#. {тр} _ {с*т} "|" %+Alt60 .o. %+Alt60 -> 0;
define r61 е -> ' о̀ м || .#. {четы́р} _ {с*т} "|" %+Alt61 .o. %+Alt61 -> 0;
define b r59 .o. r60 .o. r61;
define morphome b .o. W Gender Number %+Dat Tail;
define c20b morphome .P. ?*;
define r59 е Acc -> {ум'а} || .#. {дв} _ {с*т} "|" %+Alt59 .o. %+Alt59 -> 0;
define r60 и Acc -> {'ом'а} || .#. {тр} _ {с*т} "|" %+Alt60 .o. %+Alt60 -> 0;
define r61 е -> {'м'а} || .#. {четы́р} _ {с*т} "|" %+Alt61 .o. %+Alt61 -> 0;
define b r59 .o. r60 .o. r61;
define morphome b .o. W Gender Number %+Ins Tail;
define c20c morphome .P. [?* .o. class20 -> 0];
define c20 c20a .o. c20b .o. c20c;
!!!____________________Объединение__________________!!!
define Cleanup AccentualDeviation -> 0 || _ ;
define Stem Letter+ -> 0 || Sep _ Feature;
define g1 GetConvStress .o. Cleanup .o. Stem .o. c1 .o. c2 .o. c3 .o. c4 .o. c5 .o. c6 .o. c7 .o. c8 .o. c9 .o. c10;
define g2 c11 .o. c12 .o. c13 .o. c14 .o. c15 .o. c16 .o. c17 .o. c18 .o. c19 .o. c20;
define Alternations g1 .o. g2;
